Utah statutes.
72-12-110.   Vehicles used and drivers excluded from definitions for regulatory purposes.

(1)  A motor vehicle used in a ride-sharing arrangement is not a bus or commercial vehicle under:

(a)  Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, relating to registration; and

(b)  Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code, relating to equipment requirements and rules of the road.

(2)  The driver of a vehicle used in a ride-sharing arrangement is not a chauffeur and he is not transporting persons for compensation under the driver licensing provisions of Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver License Act.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

